en: Fonts
xx: Fonts
cs: Písma
da: Skrifttyper
de: Fonts
es: Fuentes
fr: Polices
it: Font
ja: フォント
nl: Lettertypen
no: Skrifttyper
pl: Czcionki
pt: Fontes
ru: Шрифты
sv: Teckensnitt
tr: Yazı Tipleri

en: Stock Photographs & Video Footage
xx: Stock Photographs & Video Footage
cs: Fotografie pro fotobanky a videa pro videobanky
da: Fotobibliotek
de: Stock-Fotografie & Videoclips
es: Fotografía y vídeo de stock
fr: Photos et vidéos de stock
it: Foto e filmati stock
ja: ストックフォト
nl: Stockfoto's en -videobeelden
no: Stockfotografier og -videoopptak
pl: Zdjęcia i filmy stockowe
pt: Banco de imagens e vídeos
ru: Фотографии и видеоматериалы для лицензирования
sv: Stockfoton
tr: Stok Fotoğraflar ve Video Görüntüsü

en: Virtual Currency
xx: Virtual Currency
cs: Virtuální měna
da: Virtuel valuta
de: Virtuelles Geld
es: Moneda virtual
fr: Devise virtuelle
it: Valuta virtuale
ja: 仮想通貨
nl: Virtuele valuta
no: Virtuell valuta
pl: Waluty wirtualne
pt: Moeda virtual
ru: Виртуальная валюта
sv: Virtuella valutor
tr: Sanal Para

en: Video games, Video Game Software
xx: Video Game Software
ar: ألعاب الفيديو
as: ভিডিঅ' গেম
az: Videooyunlar
be: Відэагульні
bg: Видеоигри
bn: ভিডিও গেম
cs: Videohry, Software pro videohry
da: Videospil, Videospilsoftware
de: Videospiele, PC- & Videospiele
el: Βιντεοπαιχνίδια
es: Videojuegos, Software de videojuegos
et: Videomängud
fa: بازی های ویدیویی
fi: Videopelit
fr: Jeux vidéo, Jeu vidéo (cassette ou cartouche DS, PS3, Xbox...), jeu de ps2, jeu de ps4
ga: Físchluichí
gu: વિડિઓ ગેમ્સ
hi: वीडियो गेम
hr: Videoigre
hu: Videójátékok
hy: Տեսախաղեր
id: Permainan video
is: Tölvuleikir
it: Videogiochi, Software video game
ja: ビデオゲーム, テレビゲームソフト
jw: Video game
ka: ვიდეო თამაშები
kk: Бейне ойындар
km: ហ្គេមវីដេអូ
kn: ವೀಡಿಯೊ ಗೇಮ್‌ಗಳು
ko: 비디오 게임
ky: Видео оюндары
lt: Vaizdo žaidimai
lv: Videospēles
mk: Видеоигри
ml: വീഡിയോ ഗെയിമുകൾ
mn: Видео тоглоом
mr: व्हिडिओ गेम्स
ms: Permainan video
mt: Logħob tal-vidjo
my: ဗီဒီယိုဂိမ်းများ
ne: भिडियो खेलहरू
nl: Videogames
no: Videospill
or: ଭିଡିଓ ଗେମ୍ସ
pa: ਵੀਡੀਓ ਗੇਮਾਂ
pl: Gry wideo
ps: ویډیو لوبې
pt: Jogos de vídeo
ro: Jocuri video
ru: Видеоигры
sd: وڊيو گيمز
si: වීඩියෝ ක්‍රීඩා
sk: Videohry
sl: Videoigre
so: Ciyaaraha fiidiyowga
sq: Lojëra video
sr: Видео игре
sv: Videospel
sw: Michezo ya video
ta: நிகழ்பட விளையாட்டுகள்
te: వీడియో గేమ్స్
tg: Бозиҳои видеоӣ
th: วิดีโอเกม
tk: Wideooýunlar
tl: Mga larong bidyo
tr: Video oyunları, Video Oyun Yazılımları
uk: Відеоігри
ur: ویڈیو گیمز
uz: Videoo'yinlar
vi: Trò chơi điện tử
xh: Imidlalo yevidiyo
yo: Awọn ere fidio
zh: 电子游戏
zu: Imidlalo yevidiyo

en: Electronics, Electronic products, electronics
xx: Electronics
ar: منتجات إلكترونية ، إلكترونيات
as: বৈদ্যুতিন সামগ্ৰী, ইলেক্ট্ৰনিক্স
az: Elektron məhsulları, elektronika
be: Электронныя прадукты, электроніка
bg: Електронни продукти, електроника
bn: বৈদ্যুতিন পণ্য, ইলেকট্রনিক্স
cs: Elektronika, Elektronické výrobky, elektronika
da: Elektronik, Elektroniske produkter, elektronik
de: Elektronik, Elektronische Produkte
el: Ηλεκτρονικά προϊόντα, ηλεκτρονικά
es: Electrónica, Productos electrónicos, electrónica
et: Elektroonilised tooted, elektroonika
fa: محصولات الکترونیکی، الکترونیک
fi: Elektroniset tuotteet, elektroniikka
fr: Appareils électroniques, Appareil électronique, Autre équipement électronique, Vieil appareil électrique ou électronique, Smartphone tablette et console
ga: Táirgí leictreonacha, leictreonaic
gu: ઇલેક્ટ્રોનિક ઉત્પાદનો, ઇલેક્ટ્રોનિક્સ
hi: इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उत्पाद, इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स
hr: Elektronički proizvodi, elektronika
hu: Elektronikus termékek, elektronika
hy: Էլեկտրոնային արտադրանք, էլեկտրոնիկա
id: Produk elektronik, elektronik
is: Rafeindavörur, rafeindatækni
it: Dispositivi elettronici, Prodotti elettronici, elettronica
ja: 電気製品, 電子製品、エレクトロニクス
jw: Produk elektronik, elektronik
ka: ელექტრონული პროდუქტები, ელექტრონიკა
kk: Электрондық өнімдер, электроника
km: ផលិតផលអេឡិចត្រូនិច, គ្រឿងអេឡិចត្រូនិច
kn: ಎಲೆಕ್ಟ್ರಾನಿಕ್ ಉತ್ಪನ್ನಗಳು, ಎಲೆಕ್ಟ್ರಾನಿಕ್ಸ್
ko: 전자 제품
ky: Электрондук өнүмдөр, электроника
lt: Elektroniniai produktai, elektronika
lv: Elektroniskie produkti, elektronika
mk: Електронски производи, електроника
ml: ഇലക്ട്രോണിക് ഉൽപ്പന്നങ്ങൾ, ഇലക്ട്രോണിക്സ്
mn: Цахилгаан бараа, цахилгаан хэрэгсэл
mr: इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उत्पादने, इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स
ms: Produk elektronik, elektronik
mt: Prodotti elettroniċi, elettronika
my: အီလက်ထရောနစ်ပစ္စည်းများ၊ အီလက်ထရောနစ်
ne: इलेक्ट्रोनिक उत्पादनहरू, इलेक्ट्रोनिक्स
nl: Elektronica, Elektronische producten, elektronica
no: Elektronikk, Elektroniske produkter, elektronikk
or: ଇଲେକ୍ଟ୍ରୋନିକ୍ ଉତ୍ପାଦ, ଇଲେକ୍ଟ୍ରୋନିକ୍ସ
pa: ਇਲੈਕਟ੍ਰਾਨਿਕ ਉਤਪਾਦ, ਇਲੈਕਟ੍ਰਾਨਿਕਸ
pl: Elektronika, Produkty elektroniczne, elektronika
ps: برېښنایی محصولات، برېښنا
pt: Eletrônicos, Produtos eletrónicos, eletrónica
ro: Produse electronice, electronice
ru: Электроника, Электронные продукты, электроника
sd: اليڪٽرانڪ شيون، اليڪٽرانڪس
si: විද්‍යුත් නිෂ්පාදන, ඉලෙක්ට්‍රොනික උපකරණ
sk: Elektronické výrobky, elektronika
sl: Elektronski izdelki, elektronika
so: Alaabooyinka elektarooniga ah, elektarooniga
sq: Produkte elektronike, elektronikë
sr: Електронски производи, електроника
sv: Elektronik, Elektroniska produkter, elektronik
sw: Bidhaa za elektroniki, elektroniki
ta: மின்னணு பொருட்கள், மின்னணுவியல்
te: ఎలక్ట్రానిక్ ఉత్పత్తులు, ఎలక్ట్రానిక్స్
tg: Маҳсулоти электронӣ, электроника
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์, อิเล็กทรอนิกส์
tk: Elektron önümler, elektronika
tl: Mga produktong elektroniko, elektronika
tr: Elektronik, Elektronik ürünler, elektronik
uk: Електронні продукти, електроніка
ur: الیکٹرانک مصنوعات، الیکٹرانکس
uz: Elektron mahsulotlar, elektronika
vi: Sản phẩm điện tử, điện tử
xh: Iimveliso ze-elektroniki, i-elektroniki
yo: Awọn ọja itanna, ẹrọ itanna
zh: 电子产品，电子
zu: Imikhiqizo ye-elekthronikhi, i-elekthronikhi

en: Smart devices
xx: Smart devices
ar: جهاز ذكي
ja: スマートデバイス
ko: 스마트 장치
zh: 智能设备

en: Arcade Equipment
xx: Arcade Equipment
cs: Vybavení arkádových videoheren
da: Arkadeudstyr
de: Spielautomatenbedarf
es: Artículos para videojuegos
fr: Matériel d'arcade
it: Attrezzature giochi arcade
ja: アーケードゲーム
nl: Arcadeapparatuur
no: Spillehall-utstyr
pl: Sprzęt do gier zręcznościowych
pt: Equipamento para Arcade
ru: Оборудование для аркад
sv: Spelhallsutrustning
tr: Atari Ekipmanları

en: Basketball Arcade Games
xx: Basketball Arcade Games
cs: Basketbalový hrací automat
da: Spillemaskiner\, basketball
de: Basketballspiele
es: Juegos arcade de baloncesto
fr: Jeux de basket-ball arcade
it: Giochi arcade basket
ja: バスケットボールアーケードゲーム
nl: Basketbal-arcadegames
no: Basketballspill til spillehaller
pl: Automaty do koszykówki
pt: Jogos arcade de basquete
ru: Баскетбольные игровые автоматы
sv: Arkadspel för basket
tr: Basketbol Oyunları

en: Pinball Machine Accessories
xx: Pinball Machine Accessories
cs: Doplňky k automatům na pinball
da: Flipperspil – tilbehør
de: Flipper-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para máquinas de pinball
fr: Accessoires pour flippers
it: Accessori per flipper
ja: ピンボールマシン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor flipperkasten
no: Tilbehør til pinballmaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do flipperów
pt: Acessórios para fliperamas
ru: Принадлежности для машины для пинбола
sv: Tillbehör till flipperspel
tr: Tilt Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Pinball Machines
xx: Pinball Machines
cs: Hrací automaty na pinball
da: Flipperspil
de: Flipper
es: Máquinas de pinball
fr: Flippers
it: Flipper
ja: ピンボールマシン
nl: Flipperkasten
no: Pinballmaskiner
pl: Flippery
pt: Fliperamas
ru: Машины для пинбола
sv: Flipperspel
tr: Tilt Makineleri

en: Skee-Ball Machines
xx: Skee-Ball Machines
cs: Hrací automaty na skee-ball
da: Skeeball-maskiner
de: Skee-Ball-Maschinen
es: Máquinas de skee ball
fr: Jeux de skeeball
it: Skee-ball
ja: スキーボールゲーム
nl: Skeeballmachines
no: Skee-Ball-maskiner
pl: Automaty do skee-ball
pt: Máquinas de Skee-Ball
ru: Машины для скибола
sv: Skee ball-maskiner
tr: Skeeball Makineleri

en: Video Game Arcade Cabinet Accessories
xx: Video Game Arcade Cabinet Accessories
cs: Doplňky k arkádovým automatům
da: Videospil – arkadekabinetter – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Spielautomaten
es: Accesorios para muebles de videojuegos
fr: Accessoires de bornes d'arcade
it: Accessori strutture videogiochi arcade
ja: アーケードゲーム筐体関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor arcadekasten voor videogames
no: Tilbehør til videospillkabinetter
pl: Akcesoria do automatów do gier zręcznościowych
pt: Acessórios para máquinas de vídeo game Arcade
ru: Принадлежности для игровых автоматов
sv: Tillbehör till arkadspelsautomater
tr: Video Oyun Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Video Game Arcade Cabinets
xx: Video Game Arcade Cabinets
cs: Arkádové automaty
da: Videospil – arkadekabinetter
de: Spielautomaten
es: Muebles de videojuegos de arcade
fr: Bornes d'arcade
it: Strutture videogiochi arcade
ja: アーケードゲーム筐体
nl: Arcadekasten voor videogames
no: Videospillkabinetter
pl: Automaty do gry
pt: Máquinas de vídeo game Arcade
ru: Игровые автоматы
sv: Automater för arkadspel
tr: Video Oyun Makineleri

en: Audio
xx: Audio
cs: Zvuk
da: Lyd
de: Audio
es: Audio
fr: Audio, Matériel hifi et vidéo
it: Audio
ja: オーディオ
nl: Audio
no: Lyd
pl: Audio
pt: Áudio
ru: Аудиосистемы
sv: Ljud
tr: Ses

en: Audio Accessories
xx: Audio Accessories
cs: Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství
da: Lyd – tilbehør
de: Audiozubehör
es: Accesorios de audio
fr: Accessoires audio
it: Accessori audio
ja: オーディオアクセサリー
nl: Audioaccessoires
no: Lydutstyr
pl: Akcesoria audio
pt: Acessórios para áudio
ru: Принадлежности для аудиосистем
sv: Ljudtillbehör
tr: Ses Aksesuarları

en: Audio & Video Receiver Accessories
xx: Audio & Video Receiver Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k audio a video přijímačům
da: Tilbehør til lyd- og videomodtagere
de: Audio- & Video-Receiver-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para receptores de vídeo y audio
fr: Accessoires pour récepteurs audio et vidéo
it: Accessori per ricevitori audio e video
ja: AVレシーバー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor audio- en videoreceivers
no: Tilbehør til lyd- og videomottakere
pl: Akcesoria do odbiorników audio-wideo
pt: Acessórios para receptores de áudio e vídeo
ru: Принадлежности для аудио- и видеоресиверов
sv: Tillbehör till ljud- och videomottagare
tr: Ses ve Video Alıcısı Aksesuarları

en: Headphone & Headset Accessories
xx: Headphone & Headset Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke sluchátkům a náhlavním soupravám
da: Tilbehør til hovedtelefoner og headsets
de: Kopfhörer- & Headset-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para auriculares
fr: Accessoires pour écouteurs et casques audio
it: Accessori per cuffie e auricolari
ja: ヘッドフォン・ヘッドセット関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor oor- en hoofdtelefoons
no: Tilbehør til hodetelefoner og hodesett
pl: Akcesoria do słuchawek i zestawów słuchawkowych
pt: Acessórios para fones de ouvido
ru: Принадлежности для наушников и гарнитур
sv: Tillbehör till hörlurar och headsets
tr: Kulaklık Aksesuarları

en: Headphone Cushions & Tips
xx: Headphone Cushions & Tips
cs: Náušníky ke sluchátkům
da: Ørepuder til hovedtelefoner
de: Kopfhörer- & In-Ear-Ohrhörer-Polster
es: Almohadillas para auriculares y gomas para auriculares de tapón
fr: Embouts et mousses pour écouteurs
it: Gommini e copriauricolari
ja: ヘッドフォンクッション・チップ
nl: Oorschelpkussens en oortips
no: Hodetelefonputer og -tupper
pl: Poduszki i nakładki do słuchawek
pt: Protetores e almofadas para fones de ouvido
ru: Насадки для наушников
sv: Hörlurskuddar
tr: Kulaklık Yastıkları ve Uçları

en: Karaoke System Accessories
xx: Karaoke System Accessories
cs: Systémy karaoke – příslušenství
da: Karaokesystem – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Karaoke-Systeme
es: Accesorios del sistema de karaoke
fr: Accessoires de karaoké
it: Accessori sistema karaoke
ja: カラオケ機器アクセサリー
nl: Accessoires voor karaokesystemen
no: Tilbehør til karaokesystemer
pl: Akcesoria do systemów karaoke
pt: Acessórios para sistemas de karaokê
ru: Принадлежности для систем караоке
sv: Tillbehör till karaokesystem
tr: Karaoke Sistem Aksesuarları

en: Karaoke Chips
xx: Karaoke Chips
cs: Čipy na karaoke
da: Karaoke-chips
de: Karaoke-Speicherchips
es: Chips de canciones
fr: Cartouches pour karaoké
it: Chip karaoke
ja: カラオケチップ
nl: Chips voor karaoke
no: Karaoke-minnebrikker
pl: Kartridże do karaoke
pt: Fichas de karaokê
ru: Карты с песнями караоке
sv: Musikchip för karaoke
tr: Karaoke Çipleri